Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Transportation Improvement Districts
184.375.
Revenues derived from project — How applied.

Revenues derived from each project of a transportation improvement district in connection with which any bonds are outstanding shall be first applied to pay the cost of the construction, maintenance, and repair of the project and to provide such reserves therefor as are provided for in the bond proceedings authorizing the issuance of those outstanding bonds, and otherwise as provided by the board of trustees of the district, and the balance of the pledged revenues shall be set aside, at regular intervals as are provided in the bond proceedings, in a bond service fund which is hereby pledged to and charged with the payment of the bond service charges on any outstanding bonds as provided in the applicable bond proceedings. The pledge shall be valid and binding from the time the pledge is made. The revenues and the pledged revenues thereafter received by the board shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the board, whether or not the parties have notice thereof. The bond proceedings by which a pledge is created need not be filed or recorded except in the records of the board. The use and disposition of moneys to the credit of a bond service fund shall be subject to the applicable bond proceedings. Except as is otherwise provided in the bond proceedings, a bond service fund shall be a fund for all such bonds, without distinction or priority of one (1) over another.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 180, § 11, effective July 14, 2022.

184.377.
Moneys received by board to be held and applied as provided in KRS 184.350 to 184.395 and applicable bond proceedings.

All moneys received by the board of trustees of a transportation improvement district under KRS

184.350

to

184.395

, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds, as revenues, or otherwise, are to be held and applied solely as provided in KRS

184.350

to

184.395

and in any applicable bond proceedings. The bond proceedings shall provide that any officer to whom, or any bank or trust company to which, revenues or pledged revenues are paid shall act as trustee of the moneys and hold and apply them for the purposes thereof, subject to applicable provisions of KRS 184.350 to 184.395 and the bond proceedings.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 180, § 12, effective July 14, 2022.

184.380.
Bond holder or trustee may compel performance.

Any holder of bonds issued and outstanding under KRS

184.350

to

184.395

, or any of the coupons appertaining thereto, and the trustee under any trust agreement, except to the extent the rights given by KRS

184.350

to

184.395

may be restricted or modified by the bond proceedings, may by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceedings, protect and enforce any rights under the laws of the state or granted under KRS 184.350 to 184.395 or the bond proceedings, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by KRS 184.350 to 184.395 or the bond proceedings, to be performed by the board of trustees of a transportation improvement district or any officer of the board.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 180, § 13, effective July 14, 2022.

184.383.
District not required to pay state or local taxes or assessments — Conditions.

The exercise of the powers granted by KRS

184.350

to

184.395

is in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state, for the increase of their commerce and prosperity, and for the improvement of their health and living conditions. As the construction, maintenance, and repair of projects by a transportation improvement district constitute the performance of essential governmental functions, the district shall not be required to pay any state or local taxes or assessments upon any project, or upon revenues or any property acquired or used by the district under KRS

184.350

to

184.395

, or upon the income therefrom. The bonds issued under KRS 184.350 to 184.395, their transfer, and the income therefrom, including any profit made on the sale thereof, shall at all times be free from taxation within the state.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 180, § 14, effective July 14, 2022.

184.385.
Demonstration project — Powers of Transportation Cabinet.

The Transportation Cabinet may undertake a demonstration project to study, develop, and demonstrate ways to facilitate public-private cooperation and flexibility in financing, constructing, maintaining, or operating transportation projects. In so doing, it may take all steps necessary and appropriate to facilitate the efforts of a transportation improvement district established in accordance with KRS

184.350

to

184.395

. Such steps may include advising and providing technical assistance to the district and may also include designating Transportation Cabinet engineers to serve as the cabinet’s agent to review project designs and determine if they meet state and federal specifications.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 180, § 15, effective July 14, 2022.

184.387.
Legislative findings.

It is hereby found and determined that surface transportation projects undertaken pursuant to KRS

184.350

to

184.395

are essential and will contribute to the improvement of the prosperity, health, safety, and welfare of the people of a transportation improvement district and to all of the state, and that it is in the public interest and a proper public purpose for a transportation improvement district to acquire, construct, enlarge, improve, equip, sell, lease, lease-purchase, exchange, or otherwise dispose of property, structures, and other facilities for such transportation projects. It is further found and determined that the exercise of the authority granted by KRS

184.350

to

184.395

is consistent with and will promote industry, commerce, distribution, and research activity in the state. KRS 184.350 to 184.395, being necessary for the prosperity, health, safety, and welfare of the state and its people, shall be liberally construed to effect their purposes.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 180, § 16, effective July 14, 2022.

184.390.
Consent or approval of political subdivision not required.

Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, the approval, consent, or cooperation of a political subdivision is not required for a transportation improvement district project that involves constructing or improving a highway that runs through the territory of the political subdivision and connects to a highway that is part of the interstate system.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 180, § 17, effective July 14, 2022.

184.395.
County legislative body may enter into agreement with transportation improvement district — Conditions.

The legislative body of a county may enter into an agreement with a transportation improvement district of a contiguous county for the district to undertake a project that is located wholly or partially within that county, provided that the legislative body of the county that created the transportation improvement district shall be required to enter into the agreement.

No transportation improvement district shall undertake a project that is located wholly or partially within a county that did not create the transportation improvement district except pursuant to an agreement entered into in accordance with this section, a project being undertaken by two (2) or more transportation improvement districts, or as otherwise provided by law.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 180, § 18, effective July 14, 2022.